Maine, session 132, LD673.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA c. 114-B is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 114-B
EDUCATIONAL OPPORTUNITY GRANT PROGRAM
§2661. Educational Opportunity Grant Program
1. Program created. The Educational Opportunity Grant Program, referred to in this
chapter as "the program," is created within the department to provide grants to improve
educational opportunities for and achievement of students in low-income and moderate-
income communities.
2. Use of funds. The department shall award grants from the program to school
administrative units in which the average personal income of the member municipalities is
below the state average. Funds awarded from the program may be used only for school
administrative unit programs designed to raise the educational standards of all students in
the school administrative unit. Balances remaining in the Educational Opportunity Grant
Program, General Fund account at the end of any fiscal year must be carried forward for
use by the program in the next fiscal year.
3. Rulemaking. The department shall adopt rules to implement this section, including,
but not limited to, rules governing procedures, criteria and priorities for awarding grants.
Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.